test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kurkka_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - hersku: # ok 
    hersku+N+Sg+Nom:  hersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Gen:  heersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Acc:  heersku
    hersku+N+Sg+Ill:  heerskun
    hersku+N+Sg+Loc:  heerskust
    hersku+N+Sg+Com:  herskoin
    hersku+N+Sg+Abe:  heˊrskuttáá
    hersku+N+Ess:  herskun
    hersku+N+Par:  herskud
    hersku+N+Pl+Nom:  heerskuh
    hersku+N+Pl+Gen: [heerskui, heˊrskui]
    hersku+N+Pl+Acc:  heerskuid
    hersku+N+Pl+Ill:  herskoid
    hersku+N+Pl+Loc:  heerskuin
    hersku+N+Pl+Com:  heˊrskuiguin
    hersku+N+Pl+Abe:  heˊrskuittáá

  Noun - árppu: # ok 
    árppu+N+Sg+Nom:  árppu
    árppu+N+Sg+Gen:  áárpu
    árppu+N+Sg+Acc:  áárpu
    árppu+N+Sg+Ill:  áárpun
    árppu+N+Sg+Loc:  áárpust
    árppu+N+Sg+Com:  árppoin
    árppu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊrputtáá
    árppu+N+Ess:  árppun
    árppu+N+Par:  árppud
    árppu+N+Pl+Nom:  áárpuh
    árppu+N+Pl+Gen: [áárpui, áˊrpui]
    árppu+N+Pl+Acc:  áárpuid
    árppu+N+Pl+Ill:  árppoid
    árppu+N+Pl+Loc:  áárpuin
    árppu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊrpuiguin
    árppu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊrpuittáá

  Noun - rávsku: # ok 
    rávsku+N+Sg+Nom:  rávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávskun
    rávsku+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávskust
    rávsku+N+Sg+Com:  rávskoin
    rávsku+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊvskuttáá
    rávsku+N+Ess:  rávskun
    rávsku+N+Par:  rávskud
    rávsku+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávskuh
    rávsku+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávskui, ráˊvskui]
    rávsku+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávskuid
    rávsku+N+Pl+Ill:  rávskoid
    rávsku+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávskuin
    rávsku+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊvskuiguin
    rávsku+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊvskuittáá

  Noun - čáittu: # ok 
    čáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  čáittu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  čááitu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Acc:  čááitu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  čááitun
    čáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  čááitust
    čáittu+N+Sg+Com:  čáittoin
    čáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  čáˊituttáá
    čáittu+N+Ess:  čáittun
    čáittu+N+Par:  čáittud
    čáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  čááituh
    čáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [čááitui, čáˊitui]
    čáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  čááituid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  čáittoid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  čááituin
    čáittu+N+Pl+Com:  čáˊituiguin
    čáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  čáˊituittáá

  Noun - valssâ:
    valssâ+N+Sg+Nom: valssâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaalsân
    valssâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaalsâst
    valssâ+N+Sg+Com: valssáin
    valssâ+N+Sg+Abe: vaˊlsâttáá
    valssâ+N+Ess: valssân
    valssâ+N+Par: valssâd
    valssâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaalsah
    valssâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaalsâi, vaˊlsâi]
    valssâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaalsâid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Ill: valssáid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaalsâin
    valssâ+N+Pl+Com: vaˊlsâiguin
    valssâ+N+Pl+Abe: vaˊlsâittáá

  Noun - kurkkâ:
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurkkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuurkân
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurkâst
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Com: kurkkáin
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuˊrkâttáá
    kurkkâ+N+Ess: kurkkân
    kurkkâ+N+Par: kurkkâd
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurkah
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuurkâi, kuˊrkâi]
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurkâid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: kurkkáid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurkâin
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Com: kuˊrkâiguin
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuˊrkâittáá
  
  Noun - párkku: # ok 
    párkku+N+Sg+Nom:  párkku
    párkku+N+Sg+Gen:  páárhu
    párkku+N+Sg+Acc:  páárhu
    párkku+N+Sg+Ill:  páárkun
    párkku+N+Sg+Loc:  páárhust
    párkku+N+Sg+Com:  párhoin
    párkku+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊrhuttáá
    párkku+N+Ess:  párkkun
    párkku+N+Par:  párkkud
    párkku+N+Pl+Nom:  páárhuh
    párkku+N+Pl+Gen: [páárhui, páˊrhui]
    párkku+N+Pl+Acc:  páárhuid
    párkku+N+Pl+Ill:  párhoid
    párkku+N+Pl+Loc:  páárhuin
    párkku+N+Pl+Com:  páˊrhuiguin
    párkku+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊrhuittáá
